test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VAI_N_IND_gwekshin_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI - VV - gwekshin :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4   5
  #per	neg     num     mod periph
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 232)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+gwekshin+VAI: ngwekshin
     2+gwekshin+VAI: ggwekshin

     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     gwekshin+VAI+3: gwekshin
     gwekshin+VAI+X: gwekshinam

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3
     1+gwekshin+VAI+1+Pl: ngwekshinmi
     2+gwekshin+VAI+1+Pl: ggwekshinmi
     2+gwekshin+VAI+2+Pl: ggwekshinam
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     gwekshin+VAI+3+3+4: gwekshinoon
     gwekshin+VAI+3+3+Pl: gwekshinoog

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Prt: ngwekshinnaaba
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Prt: ggwekshinnaaba
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Dub: ngwekshinnaadig
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Dub: ggwekshinnaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Prt: gwekshinwiba #w-del-less
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Dub: gwekshinwidig #w-del-less
     gwekshin+VAI+X+Prt: gwekshinmaba 
     gwekshin+VAI+X+Dub: gwekshinmidig
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub: gwekshin'goba #'cons assumption -w '3' still present
     gwekshin+VAI+3+4+Prt+Dub: gwekshinnigba #'
     gwekshin+VAI+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinwaagba
     gwekshin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub: gwekshinmigba

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3, 4
     1+gwekshin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: ngwekshinminaaba
     2+gwekshin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt: ggwekshinminaaba
     2+gwekshin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt: ggwekshinmwaaba
     1+gwekshin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: ngwekshinminaadig
     2+gwekshin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub: ggwekshinminaadig
     2+gwekshin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub: ggwekshinmwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: gwekshinwibniin    
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: gwekshinwibniig   
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: gwekshinwidgenan   
     gwekshin+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: gwekshinwidgenag  

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Neg: ngwekshinzii
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg: ggwekshinzii

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3: gwekshinzii
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+X: gwekshinziim

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: ngwekshinziimi
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl: ggwekshinziimi
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl: ggwekshinziim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 2, 5
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+3+4: gwekshinziiwan
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: gwekshinziiwag

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+Prt: ngwekshinziinaaba
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+Prt: ggwekshinziinaaba
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+Dub: ngwekshinziinaadig
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+Dub: ggwekshinziinaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: gwekshinziiwba #w-del-less
     #gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: gwekshinziiba #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub: gwekshinziiwdig #w-del-less
     #gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt: gwekshinziidig #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt: gwekshinziimba 
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub: gwekshinziimdig
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub: gwekshinziigoba 
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+4+Prt+Dub: gwekshinziin'goba #'
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+2+Pl+Prt+Dub: gwekshinziiwaagba
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub: gwekshinziimgoba

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: ngwekshinziimnaaba
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt: ggwekshinziimnaaba
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt: ggwekshinziimwaaba
     1+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: ngwekshinziimnaadig
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub: ggwekshinziimnaadig
     2+gwekshin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub: ggwekshinziimwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: gwekshinziiwbaniin #cons (w-del-less)
     #gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: gwekshinziibniin   #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: gwekshinziiwbaniig #cons (w-del-less)
     #gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: gwekshinziibniig  #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: gwekshinziiwdigenan #cons (w-del-less)
     #gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: gwekshinziidgenan   #book
     gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: gwekshinziiwdigenag #cons (w-del-less)
     #gwekshin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: gwekshinziidgenag  #book
